New York, session 2025-2026, S6229.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. The civil practice law and rules is amended by adding a new 2 section 4552 to read as follows: 3 § 4552. Statements in learned treatises, periodicals, or pamphlets. 4 (a) A statement contained in a treatise, periodical, or pamphlet shall 5 be admissible in evidence if: 6 1. the statement is called to the attention of an expert witness on 7 cross-examination or relied on by the expert on direct examination; and 8 2. the publication is established as a reliable authority by the 9 expert's admission or testimony, by another expert's testimony, or by 10 judicial notice. 11 (b) If admitted, the statement may be read into evidence but not 12 received as an exhibit. 13 § 2. This act shall take effect immediately. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD10800-01-5